Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-3,106
Sidewalks; construction or repair; special assessment; failure of owner; effect.

In case the owner or owners shall fail to construct or repair a sidewalk as provided in section 14-3,105, the city may construct or repair such sidewalk or cause such work to be done and assess the cost of such work upon the abutting property as a special assessment. Where the owner or owners of abutting property fail to keep in repair the sidewalk adjacent to such property, the owner or owners shall be liable for all damages or injuries occasioned or recovered by reason of the defective or dangerous condition of such sidewalk.

Laws 1959, c. 36, § 23, p. 204;

Laws 2015, LB361, § 8;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 111.